District of Columbia statutes.
18-101

Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context requires a different meaning:

words importing the singular include the plural, and words importing the plural include the singular;

the present tense includes the future as well as the present;

“District Court” means the United States District Court for the District of Columbia; and

“Probate Court” and “court”, respectively, mean the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 685, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 566, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 147(1)
June 4, 1982, D.C. Law 4-111, § 2(c), 29 DCR 1684
1981 Ed., § 18-101.
1973 Ed., § 18-101.
Section 30 of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that Title 18 is designated Title 18 of the District of Columbia Official Code.